Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.440

Agricultural workers and handlers of agricultural pesticides—Coordination of regulation and enforcement with department of labor and industries.

(1) As used in this section, "federal worker protection standard" or "federal standard" means the worker protection standard for agricultural workers and handlers of agricultural pesticides adopted by the United States environmental protection agency in 40 C.F.R., part 170 as it exists on June 6, 1996.

(2)(a) No rule adopted under this chapter may impose requirements that make compliance with the federal worker protection standard impossible.

(b) The department shall adopt by rule safety and health standards that are at least as effective as the federal standard. Standards adopted by the department under this section shall be adopted in coordination with the department of labor and industries.

(3) If a violation of the federal worker protection standard, or of state rules regulating activities governed by the federal standard, is investigated by the department and by the department of labor and industries, the agencies shall conduct a joint investigation if feasible, and shall share relevant information. However, an investigation conducted by the department of labor and industries under Title 51 RCW solely with regard to industrial insurance shall not be considered to be an investigation by the department of labor and industries for this purpose. The agencies shall not issue duplicate citations to an individual or business for the same violation of the federal standard or state rules regulating activities governed by the federal standard. By December 1, 1996, the department and the department of labor and industries shall jointly establish a formal agreement that: Identifies the roles of each of the two agencies in conducting investigations of activities governed by the federal standard; and provides for protection of workers and enforcement of standards that is at least [as] effective as provided for other enforcement under this chapter.

[ 1996 c 260 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1996 c 260: See notes following RCW 49.17.280.

Department of labor and industries authority: RCW 49.17.280.